Hawaii, session 2025, GM1209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that when an automobile
transfer is made in the State and title is transferred from an
owner to a buyer, the transfer is not considered complete until
the county receives certain documentation from the vehicle's new
owner, the transferee. Until that occurs, the vehicle remains
legally registered to the original owner, the transferor. As a
result, the transferor may be liable for parking tickets,
traffic infractions, and other civil or criminal liabilities
even though the transferor no longer retains possession of the
vehicle. Meanwhile, the transferee will not be held legally or
financially responsible for violations arising out of the
transferee's operation of the vehicle. This situation is unfair
and frustrating for transferors, and ripe for abuse and
exploitation by transferees. Years' worth of news reports,
including a July 2024 article in the Honolulu Star-Advertiser,
demonstrate that this problem continually plagues motorists.
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO.
The legislation further finds that the State's vehicle
title transfer law already includes language establishing that
when a transferor complies with the portions of the statute
applying to transferors, the transferor is released from
liability arising out of the operation of the transferred motor
vehicle. Despite this provision, transferors continue to incur
liability. Other states, such as Texas, have addressed this
issue by inserting statutory language that clarifies the steps a
transferor can take to avoid such liability.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to:
(1) Clarify that proof that a transferor has filed
required notice forms with the county director of
finance serves as a complete defense to any action
brought against the transferor for an act or omission,
civil or criminal, arising from the use, operation, or
abandonment of the vehicle by another person; and
(2) Require, by July 1, 2026, the judiciary to determine
whether new forms or modification of the judiciary's
website is necessary to assist vehicle transferors
and, if so, to create the forms or modify the website.
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx
linillHNnillBiMiUlllllH

Page 3
S.B. NO. ’ 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 2. Section 286-52, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§286-52 Procedure when title or interest of vehicle
transferred; delivery of certificate mandatory[—]; complete
defense. (a) Upon a transfer of the title or interest of a
legal owner in or to a vehicle registered under this part, the
person whose title or interest is to be transferred and the
transferee shall write their signatures with pen and ink upon
the certificate of ownership issued for the vehicle, together
with the addresses of the person whose title or interest is to
be transferred and the transferee in the appropriate spaces
provided upon the certificate. The signature of the person
whose title or interest is to be transferred and signature of
the transferee shall each serve as an attestation by that
respective party that the information provided on the
certificate is correct. Any person who provides false or
fraudulent information under this subsection shall be fined no
less than $500 and no more than $1,000.
(b) Within thirty calendar days thereafter, the transferee
shall forward the certificate of ownership so endorsed to the
director of finance who shall file the same; provided that if
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx


Page 4
S.B. NO. ?
the recorded lien holder does not have an office in the State,
the applicable period shall be sixty days. Whenever a
transferee fails to comply with these provisions, the director
of finance shall charge a fee of $50, in addition to the fee
provided in section 286-51, for a new certificate of ownership.
(c) Subsection (b), requiring a transferee to forward the
certificate of ownership after endorsement to the director of
finance, shall not apply to the transferee of a vehicle who was
not intending to and does not drive the vehicle or permit the
vehicle to be driven upon the public highways, but the
transferee, upon transferring the transferee's interest or title
to another, shall give notice of the transfer to the director of
finance and endorse the certificate of ownership to the new
legal owner and the certificate of registration to the new
owner. If the director of finance has ascertained as of the
date of the application that the registered owner has not
deposited or paid bail with respect to any summons or citation
issued to the registered owner for stopping, standing, or
parking in violation of traffic ordinances within the county or
has outstanding charges and fines owed to the county relating to
the disposition of an abandoned vehicle under the registered
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx

Page 5
S.B. NO. ^2
owner, including for costs related to towing, storage,
processing, and disposal, the director may require, as a
condition precedent to the transfer, that the registered owner
deposit or pay bail with respect to the summons or citations or
pay all outstanding charges and fines relating to the
disposition of the abandoned vehicle; provided that payment of
all outstanding charges and fines relating to the disposition of
the abandoned vehicle shall not be a condition precedent to the
transfer if the abandoned vehicle was stolen or taken from the
registered owner without permission or authorization and a
police report for the abandoned vehicle is filed within a period
of time, to be determined by the director of finance of each
county, after discovery of the abandoned vehicle.
(d) The director of finance[—] shall, upon receipt of the
certificate of ownership properly endorsed, [ehaii] register the
vehicle, and shall issue to the owner and legal owner entitled
thereto by reason of the transfer a new certificate of
registration and the certificate of ownership, respectively, in
the manner and form hereinabove provided for original
registration.
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx 5

Page 6
S.B. NO. Jaz
(e) Until the director of finance has issued the new
certificate of registration and certificate of ownership as
provided in subsection (d) [pf^©v4^e^] , delivery of the vehicle
shall be deemed not to have been made and title thereto shall be
deemed not to have passed, and the intended transfer shall be
deemed to be incomplete and not to be valid or effective for any
purpose, notwithstanding any provision of the Uniform Commercial
Code; provided that a security interest in a motor vehicle shall
be perfected as provided in the Uniform Commercial Code, section
490:9-311 and that the validity, attachment, priority, and
enforcement of the security interest shall be governed by
Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code.
(f) In the event of the transfer by operation of law of
the title or interest of a legal owner in and to a vehicle
registered under this part, as upon inheritance, devise,
bequest, order in bankruptcy, insolvency, execution sale,
repossession upon default in performance of the terms of a lease
or executory sales contract, or otherwise than by the voluntary
act of the person whose title or interest is so transferred, the
certificate of ownership shall be signed upon the spaces
provided by the personal representative, receiver, trustee,
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx

Page 7
S.B. NO.
sheriff, or other representative, or successor in interest of
the person whose title or interest is so transferred in lieu of
that person. Every personal representative, receiver, trustee,
sheriff, or other representative or successor hereinabove
referred to shall file with the director of finance a notice of
any transfer by sale, lease, or otherwise by the person, of the
vehicle, together with evidence satisfactory to the director of
finance of all facts entitling the person to make the transfer.
Upon notice given to the director of finance that transfer by
operation of law of the title or interest of a legal owner or a
registered owner has been effected pursuant to any provision of
law, the director of finance shall send to the legal owner or
the registered owner or both a notice by registered mail of the
action and requesting the delivery to the director of finance of
the certificate of ownership or the certificate of registration,
as the case may be, within ten days after date of mailing of the
notice, and any person who refuses or neglects to deliver the
same to the director of finance pursuant to the notice shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and punished as provided in section
286-61.
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx

Page 8
S.B. NO. ?
(g) Nothing in the foregoing subsections shall prevent a
legal owner from assigning the title or interest in or to a
vehicle registered under this part to another legal owner at any
time without the consent of and without affecting the interest
of the holder of the certificate of registration thereof. Upon
filing with the director of finance [e^] a certificate of
ownership endorsed by the legal owner and a transferee of legal
ownership, the director of finance shall, regardless of whether
the certificate of registration has expired, enter the name of
the new legal owner upon the records of the director's office
and shall forthwith issue a new certificate of ownership to the
new legal owner in the form for original registration. Upon so
doing, the director of finance shall send to the registered
owner a notice by mail of the action.
(h) Any person who refuses or neglects to deliver a
certificate of ownership to a transferee entitled thereto under
this part[—] shall be punished as provided in section 286-61.
(i) Every dealer, upon transferring a motor vehicle,
whether by sale, lease, or otherwise, shall immediately give
notice of the transfer to the director of finance upon the
official form provided by the director of finance. Each notice
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx j

Page 9
S.B. NO.
T2
h
C.D. 1
shall contain the date of the transfer, the names and addresses
of the transferor and transferee, and a description of the
vehicle as may be called for in the official form.
(j) Every person, other than a dealer, upon transferring a
motor vehicle, whether by sale, lease, or otherwise, shall
within ten days give notice of the transfer to the director of
finance upon the official form provided by the director of
finance. Every notice shall contain the date of transfer, the
names and addresses of the transferor and transferee, and a
description of the vehicle as may be called for in the official
form. Any person who violates this subsection shall be fined no
more than $100.
(k) Whenever the registered owner of any motor vehicle or
any licensed dealer has given notice to the director of finance
IS of a transfer of the title or interest in the motor vehicle, as
provided in subsection (i) or (j), and has delivered the
certificate of ownership bearing the transferor's signature to
the transferee as required by subsection (a) , the transferor
shall be relieved from any liability, civil or criminal, from
the date the transferor delivers the motor vehicle into the
transferee's possession, which the transferor might otherwise
2025-2858 SB1522 GDI SMA.docx


Page 10
S.B. NO.
subsequently incur by reason solely of being the registered
owner of the vehicle.
(1) A licensed dealer who has forwarded a properly
endorsed certificate of ownership to the director of finance
shall be relieved of any civil liability[—] from the date the
transferor delivers the motor vehicle into the transferee's
possession, which the transferor might otherwise subsequently
incur by reason solely of being the registered owner of the
vehicle; provided that a specific written authorization to
forward the certificate has been obtained from the transferee.
(m) Any person who falsely or fraudulently gives notice to
the director of finance of a transfer of title or interest in a
motor vehicle shall be subject to the penalty provided in
section 286-61.
(n) Any organization that receives a motor vehicle as a
charitable donation shall be deemed, upon receipt of the motor
vehicle, to be a transferee for purposes of this section and
shall be subject to all of the applicable rights,
responsibilities, and liabilities of a transferee under this
section.
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx


Page 11
S.B. NO. ?
(o) Proof by the transferor that the transferor has filed
the notice form in subsection (i) or (j) shall serve as a
complete defense to any action brought against the transferor
for an act or omission, civil or criminal, arising from the use,
operation, or abandonment of the vehicle by another person after
the transferor's filing of the notice form; provided that a copy
of the form shall serve as proof of the filing of the form.
(p) A transferor who submits false or fraudulent
information to complete the provisions of this section requiring
action by the transferor shall be fined not less than $500 and
not more than $1,000."
SECTION 3. No later than July 1, 2026, the judiciary
shall:
(1) Determine whether it is necessary to either:
(A) Create a new court form; or
(B) Modify the judiciary's website to provide more
information,
relating to transferors responding to actions arising
from the use, operation, or abandonment of transferred
vehicles; and
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx 11

Page 12
S.B. NO.
^2
(2) If the judiciary answers paragraph (1) in the
affirmative, create the new forms or modify the
website accordingly.
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2858 SB1522 CDl SMA.docx 12
liiiiiiiiniiiiiiiiiiHiiiii

1522
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
CD. 1
APPROVED this 29th day of May . 2025

S.B.No. 1522, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1522, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30,2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives